Massachusetts, session 194th, H3870.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
The language of M.G.L. ch. 4, s.7, clause 43 part (b) is hereby amended by adding after
the words "coast guard" the following words: "United States National Oceanic and Atmospheric
Administration Corps, United States Public Health Service, United States Space Force"
of 1